apertium-es-cs.cs.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AÁBCČDĎEÉĚFGHIÍJKLMNŇOÓPQRŘSŠTŤUÚŮVWXYÝZŽaábcčdďeéěfghiíjklmnňoópqrřsštťuúůvwxyýzžĄĆĘŃŚŻŹŁąćęńśżźłĕ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="tgv"/>

    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>

    <sdef n="ma"     c="mužský životný"/>
    <sdef n="mi"     c="mužský neživotný"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="ženský"/>
    <sdef n="nt"     c="střední"/>
    <sdef n="mf"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="m"      c=""/>

    <sdef n="nom"    c="nominativ"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="genitiv"/>
    <sdef n="dat"    c="dativ"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="akuzativ"/>
    <sdef n="ins"    c="instrumentál"/>
    <sdef n="loc"    c="lokál"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="vokativ"/>

    <sdef n="sg"     c="singulár"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="plurál"/>
    <sdef n="du"     c="duál"/>
    <sdef n="sp"     c=""/>

    <sdef n="pr"/>

    <sdef n="ppr"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>
    
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>

    <sdef n="an"/>

    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"  c="časování"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="imperf" c="nedokonavé"/>
    <sdef n="perf"   c="dokonavé"/>
    <sdef n="p1"     c="první osoba"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="druhá osoba"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="třetí osoba"/>
    <sdef n="pres"   c="přítomný čas"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="minulý čas"/>
    <sdef n="pp"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="pass"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="fti"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="inf"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c="rozkazovací způsob"/>
    
    <sdef n="indecl" c="indeclinable"/>
    <sdef n="enc"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="uns"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="vbser"  c="být"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="spojka"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="spojka"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="spojka"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" c=""/>
    <sdef n="dim"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="ij"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="cpd"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="po"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="percent" c=""/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 
    <!-- Abbreviations -->

    <pardef n="např__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ahoj__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Numerals -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <i>1</i>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[2-4]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[5-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9][0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="např"><i>např</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="tzv"><i>tzv</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="cca"><i>cca</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="atd"><i>atd</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="tj"><i>tj</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="č"><i>č</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="cm"><i>cm</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="km"><i>km</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="kg"><i>kg</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="sv"><i>sv</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ahoj"><i>ahoj</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrý den"><i>dobrý<b/>den</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="aha"><i>aha</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrou noc"><i>dobrou<b/>noc</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="mňam"><i>mňam</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="haló"><i>haló</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="na shledanou"><i>na<b/>shledanou</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="zítra na shledanou"><i>zítra<b/>na<b/>shledanou</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/> 
    </e>
